Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4506
Participation in bridge to independence program; voluntary services and support agreement; contents; services provided; independence coordinator; department; duties.

(1) If a young adult chooses to participate in the bridge to independence program and is eligible under section 43-4504, the young adult and the department shall sign, and the young adult shall be provided a copy of, a voluntary services and support agreement that includes, at a minimum, information regarding all of the following:

(a) The requirement that the young adult continue to be eligible under section 43-4504 for the duration of the voluntary services and support agreement and any other expectations of the young adult;

(b) The services and support the young adult shall receive through the bridge to independence program;

(c) The voluntary nature of the young adult's participation and the young adult's right to terminate the voluntary services and support agreement at any time; and

(d) Conditions that may result in the termination of the voluntary services and support agreement and the young adult's early discharge from the bridge to independence program as described in section 43-4507.

(2) As soon as the young adult and the department sign the voluntary services and support agreement and the department determines that the young adult is eligible for the bridge to independence program under section 43-4504, but not longer than fifteen days after signing the agreement, the department shall provide services and support to the young adult in accordance with the voluntary services and support agreement.

(3) A young adult participating in the bridge to independence program shall be assigned an independence coordinator to provide case management services for the young adult. Independence coordinators and their supervisors shall be specialized in primarily providing services for young adults in the bridge to independence program or shall, at minimum, have specialized training in providing transition services and support to young adults.

(4) The department shall provide continued efforts at achieving permanency and creating permanent connections for a young adult participating in the bridge to independence program.

(5) The department shall fulfill all case plan obligations consistent with 42 U.S.C. 675(1).

(6) As soon as possible after the young adult is determined eligible for the bridge to independence program under section 43-4504 and signs the voluntary services and support agreement, the department shall conduct a determination of income eligibility for purposes of Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 672.

Laws 2013, LB216, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 35;

Laws 2015, LB243, § 18.